apertium-eng-tel.tel.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>   ! Имя существительное · Noun
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<nom%> !

%{u%}   ! 

%>      ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

LEXICON K

# ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: K ;

LEXICON NUMBER

%<sg%>: CASE ; 
%<pl%>:%>లు  CASE ; ! lu>

LEXICON N1

%<n%>: NUMBER ;

LEXICON Nouns

కుక్క:కుక్క N1 ; ! "dog"
ఆవు:ఆవు N1 ; ! "cow"
పేరు:పేర%{u%} N1 ; ! "name"
చెట్టు:చెట్టు N1 ; ! "tree"
